District of Columbia statutes.
44-661.06

Quarterly notice and collection.

(a)

The fee imposed under § 44-661.03, which shall be calculated, due, and payable on a quarterly basis, shall be due and payable by the 15th of the last month of each DFY quarter; provided, that the fee shall not be due and payable until:

(1)

The District issues written notice that the payment methodologies for payments to hospitals required under § 44-661.05 have been approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services; and

(2)

The District issues written notice to the hospital informing the hospital of its fee rate, outpatient gross patient revenue subject to the fee, and the fee amount owed on a quarterly basis, including, in the initial written notice from the District to the hospital, all fee amounts owed beginning with the period commencing on October 1, 2015, to ensure all applicable fee obligations have been identified.

(b)

(1)

If a hospital fails to pay the full amount of the fee in accordance with this chapter, the unpaid balance shall accrue interest at the rate of 1.5% per month or any fraction thereof, which shall be added to the unpaid balance.

(2)

The Chief Financial Officer may arrange a payment plan for the amount of the fee and interest in arrears.

(c)

The payment by the hospital of the fee created in this chapter shall be reported as an allowable cost for purposes of Medicaid hospital reimbursement.

History

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5067, 62 DCR 10905